Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 2 Racing and Athletics Hearing Board

41-2-1.
Board created — Appointment and removal of members.

Within the executive department there shall be a racing and athletics hearing board. The hearing board shall consist of three (3) members, not more than two (2) of whom shall be members of the same political party, who shall be appointed by the governor as provided in this section. In the month of February in each odd numbered year, the governor shall appoint one member of the board to hold office until the first day of March in the sixth year after his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified to succeed the member whose term will next expire.

Any vacancy which may occur in the board shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. A member of the board may be removed by the governor only for cause, after being given a copy of charges against him or her and an opportunity to be heard publicly on the charges before the governor. A copy of the charges and a transcript of the record of the hearing shall be filed with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 126; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-2-1

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 145.

41-2-2.
Chairperson of board — Compensation of members.

The members of the board shall elect one of their number as chairperson upon the appointment of any new member for a full term and whenever the office may become vacant. The members of the board shall not be compensated for their services on the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 126; G.L. 1956, §

41-2-2

; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 30.

41-2-3.
Right of appeal from division.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing may in the first instance make decisions and issue orders as may to it seem proper in the administration of the provisions of laws that shall be, from time to time, assigned to its direction by the governor. Any person or persons aggrieved by a decision or order of the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall have the right to appeal to the racing and athletics hearing board by filing an appeal in writing with the board within seven (7) days from the service of the order or decision appealed from.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 127; P.L. 1940, ch. 821, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, §§ 1, 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-2-3

.

41-2-4.
Hearing and decision by board.

Upon an appeal being taken from any decision or order, the racing and athletics hearing board shall hold and conduct hearings on the appeal to be governed by rules to be adopted by the board, and in the hearings the board shall not be bound by technical rules of evidence. The board shall sit as an impartial, independent body in order to make decisions affecting the public interest and private rights. It shall hear all appeals de novo as to both the law and the facts and its decisions shall be based upon the law and upon the evidence presented to it by the division of gaming and athletics licensing and by the parties in interest. The concurrence of a majority of the board shall be sufficient for any decision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 127; P.L. 1940, ch. 821, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-2-4

.

41-2-5.
Subpoena powers of board — Rules and regulations.

The members of the racing and athletics hearing board are hereby severally authorized and empowered to administer oaths; and the board, in all cases of every nature pending before it, is hereby authorized and empowered to summon and examine witnesses and to compel the production and examination of papers, books, accounts, documents, records, certificates, and other legal evidence that may be necessary or proper for the determination and decision of any question before or the discharge of any duty required by law of the board.

All subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum shall be signed by the chairperson or, in the absence or disqualification of the chairperson, by any other member thereof, and shall be served as subpoenas are now served in civil cases in the superior court; and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as are now provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court. If any person fails to obey the command of any subpoena, without reasonable cause, or if a person in attendance before the board shall, without reasonable cause, refuse to be sworn, or to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, the board may apply to any justice of the superior court, upon proof by affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) or more than five (5) days, directing the person to show cause why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt.

Upon the return of an order, the justice before whom the matter is brought for a hearing shall examine under oath the person and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents, material to the issue, that he or she was ordered to bring or produce, he or she may forthwith commit the person to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until he or she submits to do the act that he or she was so required to do, or is discharged according to law.

The board shall have power to adopt reasonable rules and regulations governing the procedure to be followed in any matter that may come before it for hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 130; P.L. 1940, ch. 821, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-2-5

; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 34.

41-2-6.
Judicial review by superior court.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing or any party in interest, if aggrieved by a decision of the board, shall be entitled to judicial review as provided by chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 127, as enacted by P.L. 1940, ch. 821, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

41-2-6

; as reen. 1969.

41-2-7.
Exclusive remedy.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

42-20-13

, or other provisions of laws, the procedures established by §§

41-2-3

,

41-2-4

, and

41-2-6

shall constitute the exclusive remedies for persons aggrieved by any order or decision of the division of gaming and athletics licensing or of the racing and athletics hearing board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 127; P.L. 1940, ch. 821, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-2-7

.